Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6201.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 82.45.010 and 2025 c 159 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) As used in this chapter, the term "sale" has its ordinary meaning and includes any conveyance, grant, assignment, quitclaim, or transfer of the ownership of or title to real property, including standing timber, or any estate or interest therein for a valuable consideration, and any contract for such conveyance, grant, assignment, quitclaim, or transfer, and any lease with an option to purchase real property, including standing timber, or any estate or interest therein or other contract under which possession of the property is given to the purchaser, or any other person at the purchaser's direction, and title to the property is retained by the vendor as security for the payment of the purchase price. The term also includes the grant, assignment, quitclaim, sale, or transfer of improvements constructed upon leased land.(2)(a) The term "sale" also includes the transfer or acquisition within any 36 month period of a controlling interest in any entity with an interest in real property located in this state for a valuable consideration.(b) For the sole purpose of determining whether, pursuant to the exercise of an option, a controlling interest was transferred or acquired within a 36 month period, the date that the option agreement was executed is the date on which the transfer or acquisition of the controlling interest is deemed to occur. For all other purposes under this chapter, the date upon which the option is exercised is the date of the transfer or acquisition of the controlling interest.(c) For purposes of this subsection, all acquisitions of persons acting in concert must be aggregated for purposes of determining whether a transfer or acquisition of a controlling interest has taken place. The department must adopt standards by rule to determine when persons are acting in concert. In adopting a rule for this purpose, the department must consider the following:(i) Persons must be treated as acting in concert when they have a relationship with each other such that one person influences or controls the actions of another through common ownership; and(ii) When persons are not commonly owned or controlled, they must be treated as acting in concert only when the unity with which the purchasers have negotiated and will consummate the transfer of ownership interests supports a finding that they are acting as a single entity. If the acquisitions are completely independent, with each purchaser buying without regard to the identity of the other purchasers, then the acquisitions are considered separate acquisitions.(3) The term "sale" does not include:(a) A transfer by gift, devise, or inheritance.(b) A transfer by transfer on death deed, to the extent that it is not in satisfaction of a contractual obligation of the decedent owed to the recipient of the property.(c) A transfer of any leasehold interest other than of the type mentioned above.(d) A cancellation or forfeiture of a vendee's interest in a contract for the sale of real property, whether or not such contract contains a forfeiture clause, or deed in lieu of foreclosure of a mortgage.(e) The partition of property by tenants in common by agreement or as the result of a court decree.(f) The assignment of property or interest in property from one spouse or one domestic partner to the other spouse or other domestic partner in accordance with the terms of a decree of dissolution of marriage or state registered domestic partnership or in fulfillment of a property settlement agreement.(g) The assignment or other transfer of a vendor's interest in a contract for the sale of real property, even though accompanied by a conveyance of the vendor's interest in the real property involved.(h) Transfers by appropriation or decree in condemnation proceedings brought by the United States, the state or any political subdivision thereof, or a municipal corporation.(i) A mortgage or other transfer of an interest in real property merely to secure a debt, or the assignment thereof.(j) Any transfer or conveyance made pursuant to a deed of trust or an order of sale by the court in any mortgage, deed of trust, or lien foreclosure proceeding or upon execution of a judgment, or deed in lieu of foreclosure to satisfy a mortgage or deed of trust.(k) A conveyance to the federal housing administration or veterans administration by an authorized mortgagee made pursuant to a contract of insurance or guaranty with the federal housing administration or veterans administration.(l) A transfer in compliance with the terms of any lease or contract upon which the tax as imposed by this chapter has been paid or where the lease or contract was entered into prior to the date this tax was first imposed.(m) The sale of any grave or lot in an established cemetery.(n) A sale by the United States, this state or any political subdivision thereof, or a municipal corporation of this state.(o) A sale to a regional transit authority or public corporation under RCW 81.112.320 under a sale/leaseback agreement under RCW 81.112.300.(p) A transfer of real property, however effected, if it consists of a mere change in identity or form of ownership of an entity where there is no change in the beneficial ownership. These include transfers to a corporation or partnership which is wholly owned by the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner. However, if thereafter such transferee corporation or partnership voluntarily transfers such real property, or such transferor, spouse or domestic partner, or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner voluntarily transfer stock in the transferee corporation or interest in the transferee partnership capital, as the case may be, to other than (i) the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner, (ii) a trust having the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner as the only beneficiaries at the time of the transfer to the trust, or (iii) a corporation or partnership wholly owned by the original transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner, within three years of the original transfer to which this exemption applies, and the tax on the subsequent transfer has not been paid within 60 days of becoming due, excise taxes become due and payable on the original transfer as otherwise provided by law.(q)(i) A transfer that for federal income tax purposes does not involve the recognition of gain or loss for entity formation, liquidation or dissolution, and reorganization, including but not limited to nonrecognition of gain or loss because of application of 26 U.S.C. Sec. 332, 337, 351, 368(a)(1), 721, or 731 of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended.(ii) However, the transfer described in (q)(i) of this subsection cannot be preceded or followed within a 36 month period by another transfer or series of transfers, that, when combined with the otherwise exempt transfer or transfers described in (q)(i) of this subsection, results in the transfer of a controlling interest in the entity for valuable consideration, and in which one or more persons previously holding a controlling interest in the entity receive cash or property in exchange for any interest the person or persons acting in concert hold in the entity. This subsection (3)(q)(ii) does not apply to that part of the transfer involving property received that is the real property interest that the person or persons originally contributed to the entity or when one or more persons who did not contribute real property or belong to the entity at a time when real property was purchased receive cash or personal property in exchange for that person or persons' interest in the entity. The real estate excise tax under this subsection (3)(q)(ii) is imposed upon the person or persons who previously held a controlling interest in the entity.(r) A qualified sale of a manufactured/mobile home community, as defined in RCW 59.20.030.(s)(i) A transfer of a qualified low-income housing development or controlling interest in a qualified low-income housing development, unless, due to noncompliance with federal statutory requirements, the seller is subject to recapture, in whole or in part, of its allocated federal low-income housing tax credits within the four years prior to the date of transfer.(ii) For purposes of this subsection (3)(s), "qualified low-income housing development" means real property and improvements in respect to which the seller or, in the case of a transfer of a controlling interest, the owner or beneficial owner, was allocated federal low-income housing tax credits authorized under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 42 or successor statute, by the Washington state housing finance commission or successor state-authorized tax credit allocating agency.(iii) This subsection (3)(s) does not apply to transfers of a qualified low-income housing development or controlling interest in a qualified low-income housing development occurring on or after July 1, 2035.(iv) The Washington state housing finance commission, in consultation with the department, must gather data on: (A) The fiscal savings, if any, accruing to transferees as a result of the exemption provided in this subsection (3)(s); (B) the extent to which transferors of qualified low-income housing developments receive consideration, including any assumption of debt, as part of a transfer subject to the exemption provided in this subsection (3)(s); and (C) the continued use of the property for low-income housing. The Washington state housing finance commission must provide this information to the joint legislative audit and review committee. The committee must conduct a review of the tax preference created under this subsection (3)(s) in calendar year 2033, as required under chapter 43.136 RCW.(t)(i) A qualified transfer of residential property by a legal representative of a person with developmental disabilities to a qualified entity subject to the following conditions:(A) The adult child with developmental disabilities of the transferor of the residential property must be allowed to reside in the residence or successor property so long as the placement is safe and appropriate as determined by the department of social and health services;(B) The title to the residential property is conveyed without the receipt of consideration by the legal representative of a person with developmental disabilities to a qualified entity;(C) The residential property must have no more than four living units located on it; and(D) The residential property transferred must remain in continued use for 50 years by the qualified entity as supported living for persons with developmental disabilities by the qualified entity or successor entity. If the qualified entity sells or otherwise conveys ownership of the residential property the proceeds of the sale or conveyance must be used to acquire similar residential property and such similar residential property must be considered the successor for continued use. The property will not be considered in continued use if the department of social and health services finds that the property has failed, after a reasonable time to remedy, to meet any health and safety statutory or regulatory requirements. If the department of social and health services determines that the property fails to meet the requirements for continued use, the department of social and health services must notify the department and the real estate excise tax based on the value of the property at the time of the transfer into use as residential property for persons with developmental disabilities becomes immediately due and payable by the qualified entity. The tax due is not subject to penalties, fees, or interest under this title.(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (3)(t) the definitions in RCW 71A.10.020 apply.(iii) A "qualified entity" is:(A) A nonprofit organization under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, as of June 7, 2018, or a subsidiary under the same taxpayer identification number that provides residential supported living for persons with developmental disabilities; or(B) A nonprofit adult family home, as defined in RCW 70.128.010, that exclusively serves persons with developmental disabilities.(iv) In order to receive an exemption under this subsection (3)(t) an affidavit must be submitted by the transferor of the residential property and must include a copy of the transfer agreement and any other documentation as required by the department.(u)(i) The sale by an affordable homeownership facilitator of self-help housing to a low-income household.(ii) The definitions in this subsection (3)(u) apply to this subsection (3)(u) unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(A) "Affordable homeownership facilitator" means a nonprofit community or neighborhood-based organization that is exempt from income tax under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c) of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, as of October 1, 2019, and that is the developer of self-help housing.(B) "Low-income" means household income as defined by the department, provided that the definition may not exceed 80 percent of median household income, adjusted for household size, for the county in which the dwelling is located.(C) "Self-help housing" means dwelling residences provided for ownership by low-income individuals and families whose ownership requirement includes labor participation. "Self-help housing" does not include residential rental housing provided on a commercial basis to the general public.(v)(i) A sale or transfer of real property to a qualifying grantee that uses the property for housing for low-income persons and receives or otherwise qualifies the property for an exemption from real and personal property taxes under RCW 84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210, 35.21.755, section 3 of this act, or 84.36.010. ((For purposes of this subsection (3)(v), "qualifying grantee" means a nonprofit entity as defined in RCWÂ  84.36.560, a nonprofit entity or qualified cooperative association as defined in RCW 84.36.049, a housing authority created under RCWÂ  35.82.030Â orÂ  35.82.300, a public corporation established under RCWÂ  35.21.660Â orÂ  35.21.730, or a county or municipal corporation.)) A qualifying grantee that is a county or municipal corporation must record a covenant at the time of transfer that prohibits using the property for any purpose other than for low-income housing for a period of at least 10 years. A qualifying grantee that is a social housing agency must record a covenant at the time of transfer that the property will primarily be used for low-income housing for a period of at least 15 years. At a minimum, the covenant must address price restrictions and household income limits for the low-income housing. A qualifying grantee must comply with the requirements described in (v)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection and must also certify, by affidavit at the time of sale or transfer, that it intends to comply with those requirements.(A) If the qualifying grantee intends to operate existing housing on the property, within one year of the sale or transfer:(I) The qualifying grantee must receive or qualify the property for a tax exemption under RCWÂ  84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210,Â  35.21.755, section 3 of this act, orÂ  84.36.010; and(II) The property must be used as housing for low-income persons.(B) If the qualifying grantee intends to develop new housing on the site, within five years of the sale or transfer:(I) The qualifying grantee must receive or qualify the property for a tax exemption under RCWÂ  84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210,Â  35.21.755, section 3 of this act, orÂ  84.36.010; and(II) The property must be used as housing for low-income persons.(C) If the qualifying grantee intends to substantially rehabilitate the premises as defined in RCWÂ  59.18.200, within three years:(I) The qualifying grantee must receive or qualify the property for a tax exemption under RCWÂ  84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210,Â  35.21.755, section 3 of this act, orÂ  84.36.010; and(II) The property must be used as housing for low-income persons.(ii) If the qualifying grantee fails to satisfy the requirements described in (v)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection, within the timelines described in (v)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection, the qualifying grantee must pay the tax that would have otherwise been due at the time of initial transfer, plus interest calculated from the date of initial transfer pursuant to RCWÂ  82.32.050.(iii) If a qualifying grantee transfers the property to a different qualifying grantee within the original timelines described in (v)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection, neither the original qualifying grantee nor the new qualifying grantee is required toÂ pay the tax, so long as the new qualifying grantee satisfies the requirements as described in (v)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection within the exemption period of the initial transfer. If the new qualifying grantee fails to satisfy the requirements described in (v)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection, only the new qualifying grantee is liable for the payment of taxes required by (v)(ii) of this subsection. There is no limit on the number of transfers between qualifying grantees within the original timelines.(iv) Each affidavit must be filed with the department upon completion of the sale or transfer of property, including transfers from a qualifying grantee to a different qualifying grantee. The qualifying grantee must provide proof to the department as required by the department once the requirements as described in (v)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection have been satisfied.(v) For the purposes of this subsection (3)(v), (("low))the following definitions apply:(A) "Low-income" has the same meaning as in (u) of this subsection;(B) "Moderate-income household" means a single person, family, or unrelated persons living together whose adjusted income is more than 80 percent but at or below 115 percent of the median household income adjusted for household size, for the county where the household is located, as reported by the United States department of housing and urban development;(C) "Qualifying grantee" means a nonprofit entity as defined in RCW 84.36.560, a nonprofit entity or qualified cooperative association as defined in RCW 84.36.049, a housing authority created under RCW 35.82.030 or 35.82.300, a public corporation established under RCW 35.21.660 or 35.21.730, a county or municipal corporation, or a social housing agency;(D) "Social housing" means mixed-income housing that is made available by a social housing agency for a period of at least 99 years to primarily serve low-income or moderate-income households; and(E) "Social housing agency" means any public corporation created under RCW 35.21.730(5) for the purpose of developing, maintaining, and operating social housing.(w)(i) Beginning January 1, 2026, the sale of qualified space in a development that qualifies for a property tax exemption under RCW 84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210, 35.21.755, or 84.36.010 to a nonprofit organization, a housing authority, or public corporation for use for an exempt community purpose.(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (3)(w), the following definitions apply:(A) "Affordable housing development" means a development with housing provided to households with a household income that does not exceed 80 percent of median household income at initial occupancy, adjusted for household size, for the county in which the dwelling is located.(B) "Exempt community purpose" means any use to provide a service that benefits affordable housing development tenants or the public including, but not limited to, health clinics, senior day care, food banks, community centers, and early learning facilities.(C) "Nonprofit organization" means an organization exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3)), as amended.(D) "Qualified space" means any portion of an affordable housing development that is accessible to tenants or the public that constitutes a separate legal parcel of property under chapter 64.32, 64.34, or 64.90 RCW.Sec. 2. RCW 82.45.010 and 2025 c 159 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) As used in this chapter, the term "sale" has its ordinary meaning and includes any conveyance, grant, assignment, quitclaim, or transfer of the ownership of or title to real property, including standing timber, or any estate or interest therein for a valuable consideration, and any contract for such conveyance, grant, assignment, quitclaim, or transfer, and any lease with an option to purchase real property, including standing timber, or any estate or interest therein or other contract under which possession of the property is given to the purchaser, or any other person at the purchaser's direction, and title to the property is retained by the vendor as security for the payment of the purchase price. The term also includes the grant, assignment, quitclaim, sale, or transfer of improvements constructed upon leased land.(2)(a) The term "sale" also includes the transfer or acquisition within any 36 month period of a controlling interest in any entity with an interest in real property located in this state for a valuable consideration.(b) For the sole purpose of determining whether, pursuant to the exercise of an option, a controlling interest was transferred or acquired within a 36 month period, the date that the option agreement was executed is the date on which the transfer or acquisition of the controlling interest is deemed to occur. For all other purposes under this chapter, the date upon which the option is exercised is the date of the transfer or acquisition of the controlling interest.(c) For purposes of this subsection, all acquisitions of persons acting in concert must be aggregated for purposes of determining whether a transfer or acquisition of a controlling interest has taken place. The department must adopt standards by rule to determine when persons are acting in concert. In adopting a rule for this purpose, the department must consider the following:(i) Persons must be treated as acting in concert when they have a relationship with each other such that one person influences or controls the actions of another through common ownership; and(ii) When persons are not commonly owned or controlled, they must be treated as acting in concert only when the unity with which the purchasers have negotiated and will consummate the transfer of ownership interests supports a finding that they are acting as a single entity. If the acquisitions are completely independent, with each purchaser buying without regard to the identity of the other purchasers, then the acquisitions are considered separate acquisitions.(3) The term "sale" does not include:(a) A transfer by gift, devise, or inheritance.(b) A transfer by transfer on death deed, to the extent that it is not in satisfaction of a contractual obligation of the decedent owed to the recipient of the property.(c) A transfer of any leasehold interest other than of the type mentioned above.(d) A cancellation or forfeiture of a vendee's interest in a contract for the sale of real property, whether or not such contract contains a forfeiture clause, or deed in lieu of foreclosure of a mortgage.(e) The partition of property by tenants in common by agreement or as the result of a court decree.(f) The assignment of property or interest in property from one spouse or one domestic partner to the other spouse or other domestic partner in accordance with the terms of a decree of dissolution of marriage or state registered domestic partnership or in fulfillment of a property settlement agreement.(g) The assignment or other transfer of a vendor's interest in a contract for the sale of real property, even though accompanied by a conveyance of the vendor's interest in the real property involved.(h) Transfers by appropriation or decree in condemnation proceedings brought by the United States, the state or any political subdivision thereof, or a municipal corporation.(i) A mortgage or other transfer of an interest in real property merely to secure a debt, or the assignment thereof.(j) Any transfer or conveyance made pursuant to a deed of trust or an order of sale by the court in any mortgage, deed of trust, or lien foreclosure proceeding or upon execution of a judgment, or deed in lieu of foreclosure to satisfy a mortgage or deed of trust.(k) A conveyance to the federal housing administration or veterans administration by an authorized mortgagee made pursuant to a contract of insurance or guaranty with the federal housing administration or veterans administration.(l) A transfer in compliance with the terms of any lease or contract upon which the tax as imposed by this chapter has been paid or where the lease or contract was entered into prior to the date this tax was first imposed.(m) The sale of any grave or lot in an established cemetery.(n) A sale by the United States, this state or any political subdivision thereof, or a municipal corporation of this state.(o) A sale to a regional transit authority or public corporation under RCW 81.112.320 under a sale/leaseback agreement under RCW 81.112.300.(p) A transfer of real property, however effected, if it consists of a mere change in identity or form of ownership of an entity where there is no change in the beneficial ownership. These include transfers to a corporation or partnership which is wholly owned by the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner. However, if thereafter such transferee corporation or partnership voluntarily transfers such real property, or such transferor, spouse or domestic partner, or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner voluntarily transfer stock in the transferee corporation or interest in the transferee partnership capital, as the case may be, to other than (i) the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner, (ii) a trust having the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner as the only beneficiaries at the time of the transfer to the trust, or (iii) a corporation or partnership wholly owned by the original transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner, within three years of the original transfer to which this exemption applies, and the tax on the subsequent transfer has not been paid within sixty days of becoming due, excise taxes become due and payable on the original transfer as otherwise provided by law.(q)(i) A transfer that for federal income tax purposes does not involve the recognition of gain or loss for entity formation, liquidation or dissolution, and reorganization, including but not limited to nonrecognition of gain or loss because of application of 26 U.S.C. Sec. 332, 337, 351, 368(a)(1), 721, or 731 of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended.(ii) However, the transfer described in (q)(i) of this subsection cannot be preceded or followed within a 36 month period by another transfer or series of transfers, that, when combined with the otherwise exempt transfer or transfers described in (q)(i) of this subsection, results in the transfer of a controlling interest in the entity for valuable consideration, and in which one or more persons previously holding a controlling interest in the entity receive cash or property in exchange for any interest the person or persons acting in concert hold in the entity. This subsection (3)(q)(ii) does not apply to that part of the transfer involving property received that is the real property interest that the person or persons originally contributed to the entity or when one or more persons who did not contribute real property or belong to the entity at a time when real property was purchased receive cash or personal property in exchange for that person or persons' interest in the entity. The real estate excise tax under this subsection (3)(q)(ii) is imposed upon the person or persons who previously held a controlling interest in the entity.(r) A qualified sale of a manufactured/mobile home community, as defined in RCW 59.20.030, that takes place on or after June 12, 2008, but before December 31, 2018.(s)(i) A transfer of a qualified low-income housing development or controlling interest in a qualified low-income housing development, unless, due to noncompliance with federal statutory requirements, the seller is subject to recapture, in whole or in part, of its allocated federal low-income housing tax credits within the four years prior to the date of transfer.(ii) For purposes of this subsection (3)(s), "qualified low-income housing development" means real property and improvements in respect to which the seller or, in the case of a transfer of a controlling interest, the owner or beneficial owner, was allocated federal low-income housing tax credits authorized under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 42 or successor statute, by the Washington state housing finance commission or successor state-authorized tax credit allocating agency.(iii) This subsection (3)(s) does not apply to transfers of a qualified low-income housing development or controlling interest in a qualified low-income housing development occurring on or after July 1, 2035.(iv) The Washington state housing finance commission, in consultation with the department, must gather data on: (A) The fiscal savings, if any, accruing to transferees as a result of the exemption provided in this subsection (3)(s); (B) the extent to which transferors of qualified low-income housing developments receive consideration, including any assumption of debt, as part of a transfer subject to the exemption provided in this subsection (3)(s); and (C) the continued use of the property for low-income housing. The Washington state housing finance commission must provide this information to the joint legislative audit and review committee. The committee must conduct a review of the tax preference created under this subsection (3)(s) in calendar year 2033, as required under chapter 43.136 RCW.(t)(i) A qualified transfer of residential property by a legal representative of a person with developmental disabilities to a qualified entity subject to the following conditions:(A) The adult child with developmental disabilities of the transferor of the residential property must be allowed to reside in the residence or successor property so long as the placement is safe and appropriate as determined by the department of social and health services;(B) The title to the residential property is conveyed without the receipt of consideration by the legal representative of a person with developmental disabilities to a qualified entity;(C) The residential property must have no more than four living units located on it; and(D) The residential property transferred must remain in continued use for 50 years by the qualified entity as supported living for persons with developmental disabilities by the qualified entity or successor entity. If the qualified entity sells or otherwise conveys ownership of the residential property the proceeds of the sale or conveyance must be used to acquire similar residential property and such similar residential property must be considered the successor for continued use. The property will not be considered in continued use if the department of social and health services finds that the property has failed, after a reasonable time to remedy, to meet any health and safety statutory or regulatory requirements. If the department of social and health services determines that the property fails to meet the requirements for continued use, the department of social and health services must notify the department and the real estate excise tax based on the value of the property at the time of the transfer into use as residential property for persons with developmental disabilities becomes immediately due and payable by the qualified entity. The tax due is not subject to penalties, fees, or interest under this title.(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (3)(t) the definitions in RCW 71A.10.020 apply.(iii) A "qualified entity" is:(A) A nonprofit organization under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, as of June 7, 2018, or a subsidiary under the same taxpayer identification number that provides residential supported living for persons with developmental disabilities; or(B) A nonprofit adult family home, as defined in RCW 70.128.010, that exclusively serves persons with developmental disabilities.(iv) In order to receive an exemption under this subsection (3)(t) an affidavit must be submitted by the transferor of the residential property and must include a copy of the transfer agreement and any other documentation as required by the department.(u)(i) A sale or transfer of real property to a qualifying grantee that uses the property for housing for low-income persons and receives or otherwise qualifies the property for an exemption from real and personal property taxes under RCW 84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210, 35.21.755, section 3 of this act, or 84.36.010. ((For purposes of this subsection (3)(u), "qualifying grantee" means a nonprofit entity as defined in RCWÂ  84.36.560, a nonprofit entity or qualified cooperative association as defined in RCW 84.36.049, a housing authority created under RCWÂ  35.82.030Â orÂ  35.82.300, a public corporation established under RCWÂ  35.21.660Â orÂ  35.21.730, or a county or municipal corporation.)) A qualifying grantee that is a county or municipal corporation must record a covenant at the time of transfer that prohibits using the property for any purpose other than for low-income housing for a period of at least 10 years. A qualifying grantee that is a social housing agency must record a covenant at the time of transfer that the property will primarily be used for low-income housing for a period of at least 15 years. At a minimum, the covenant must address price restrictions and household income limits for the low-income housing. A qualifying grantee must comply with the requirements described in (u)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection and must also certify, by affidavit at the time of sale or transfer, that it intends to comply with those requirements.(A) If the qualifying grantee intends to operate existing housing on the property, within one year of the sale or transfer:(I) The qualifying grantee must receive or qualify the property for a tax exemption under RCWÂ  84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210,Â  35.21.755, section 3 of this act, orÂ  84.36.010; and(II) The property must be used as housing for low-income persons.(B) If the qualifying grantee intends to develop new housing on the site, within five years of the sale or transfer:(I) The qualifying grantee must receive or qualify the property for a tax exemption under RCWÂ  84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210,Â  35.21.755, section 3 of this act, orÂ  84.36.010; and(II) The property must be used as housing for low-income persons.(C) If the qualifying grantee intends to substantially rehabilitate the premises as defined in RCWÂ  59.18.200, within three years:(I) The qualifying grantee must receive or qualify the property for a tax exemption under RCWÂ  84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210,Â  35.21.755, section 3 of this act, orÂ  84.36.010; and(II) The property must be used as housing for low-income persons.(ii) If the qualifying grantee fails to satisfy the requirements described in (u)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection, within the timelines described in (u)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection, the qualifying grantee must pay the tax that would have otherwise been due at the time of initial transfer, plus interest calculated from the date of initial transfer pursuant to RCWÂ  82.32.050.(iii) If a qualifying grantee transfers the property to a different qualifying grantee within the original timelines described in (u)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection, neither the original qualifying grantee nor the new qualifying grantee is required toÂ pay the tax, so long as the new qualifying grantee satisfies the requirements as described in (u)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection within the exemption period of the initial transfer. If the new qualifying grantee fails to satisfy the requirements described in (u)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection, only the new qualifying grantee is liable for the payment of taxes required by (u)(ii) of this subsection. There is no limit on the number of transfers between qualifying grantees within the original timelines.(iv) Each affidavit must be filed with the department upon completion of the sale or transfer of property, including transfers from a qualifying grantee to a different qualifying grantee. The qualifying grantee must provide proof to the department as required by the department once the requirements as described in (u)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection have been satisfied.(v) For the purposes of this subsection (3)(u), "((low))the following definitions apply:(A) "Low-income" means household income as defined by the department, provided that the definition may not exceed 80 percent of median household income, adjusted for household size, for the county in which the dwelling is located;(B) "Moderate-income household" means a single person, family, or unrelated persons living together whose adjusted income is more than 80 percent but at or below 115 percent of the median household income adjusted for household size, for the county where the household is located, as reported by the United States department of housing and urban development;(C) "Qualifying grantee" means a nonprofit entity as defined in RCW 84.36.560, a nonprofit entity or qualified cooperative association as defined in RCW 84.36.049, a housing authority created under RCW 35.82.030 or 35.82.300, a public corporation established under RCW 35.21.660 or 35.21.730, a county or municipal corporation, or a social housing agency;(D) "Social housing" means mixed-income housing that is made available by a social housing agency for a period of at least 99 years to primarily serve low-income or moderate-income households; and(E) "Social housing agency" means any public corporation created under RCW 35.21.730(5) for the purpose of developing, maintaining, and operating social housing.(v)(i) The sale of qualified space in a development that qualifies for a property tax exemption under RCW 84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210, 35.21.755, or 84.36.010 to a nonprofit organization, a housing authority, or public corporation for use for an exempt community purpose.(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (3)(v), the following definitions apply:(A) "Affordable housing development" means a development with housing provided to households with a household income that does not exceed 80 percent of median household income at initial occupancy, adjusted for household size, for the county in which the dwelling is located.(B) "Exempt community purpose" means any use to provide a service that benefits affordable housing development tenants or the public including, but not limited to, health clinics, senior day care, food banks, community centers, and early learning facilities.(C) "Nonprofit organization" means an organization exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3)), as amended.(D) "Qualified space" means any portion of an affordable housing development that is accessible to tenants or the public that constitutes a separate legal parcel of property under chapter 64.32, 64.34, or 64.90 RCW.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW to read as follows:(1) The real and personal property owned or used by a social housing agency in providing rental housing for qualifying households is exempt from taxation if:(a) At least 50 percent of the occupied dwelling units in the rental housing are occupied by a qualifying household; and(b) The rental housing was insured, financed, or assisted in whole or in part through one or more of the following sources:(i) A federal or state housing program administered by the department of commerce;(ii) A federal housing program administered by a city or county government;(iii) An affordable housing levy authorized under RCW 84.52.105 or 84.55.050;(iv) The Washington state housing finance commission;(v) The surcharges authorized by RCW 36.22.250 and any of the surcharges authorized in chapter 43.185C RCW; or(vi) City or county funds designated for affordable or social housing.(2) If less than 50 percent of the occupied dwelling units within the rental housing are occupied by qualifying households, the rental housing is eligible for a partial exemption on the real property and a total exemption of the housing's personal property as follows:(a) A partial exemption is allowed for each dwelling unit in the rental housing occupied by a qualifying household.(b) The amount of exemption must be calculated by multiplying the assessed value of the property reasonably necessary to provide the rental housing by a fraction. The numerator of the fraction is the number of dwelling units occupied by qualifying households as of December 31st of the first assessment year in which the rental housing becomes operational or on January 1st of each subsequent assessment year for which the exemption is claimed. The denominator of the fraction is the total number of dwelling units occupied as of December 31st of the first assessment year the rental housing becomes operational and January 1st of each subsequent assessment year for which the exemption is claimed.(3) If a currently exempt rental housing unit was occupied by a qualifying household at the time the exemption was granted and the income of the household subsequently rises above the threshold set in subsection (7)(f) of this section but remains at or below 115 percent of the median income, the exemption will continue as long as the housing continues to meet the certification requirements listed in subsection (1) of this section. For purposes of this section, median income, as most recently determined by the federal department of housing and urban development for the county in which the rental housing or mobile home park is located, must be adjusted for family size. However, if a dwelling unit or a lot becomes vacant and is subsequently rerented, the income of the new household must be at or below the threshold set in subsection (7)(f) of this section to remain exempt from property tax.(4) If at the time of initial application the property is unoccupied, or subsequent to the initial application the property is unoccupied because of renovations, and the property is not currently being used for the exempt purpose authorized by this section but will be used for the exempt purpose within three assessment years, the property is eligible for a property tax exemption for the assessment year in which the claim for exemption is submitted under the following conditions:(a) A commitment for financing to acquire, construct, renovate, or otherwise convert the property to provide housing for qualifying households has been obtained, in whole or in part, by the social housing agency claiming the exemption from one or more of the sources listed in subsection (1)(b) of this section;(b) The social housing agency has manifested its intent in writing to construct, remodel, or otherwise convert the property to housing for qualifying households; and(c) Only the portion of property that will be used to provide housing or lots for qualifying households is exempt under this section.(5) To be exempt under this section, the property must be used exclusively for the purposes for which the exemption is granted, except as provided in RCW 84.36.805.(6) The social housing agency qualifying for a property tax exemption under this section may agree to make payments to the city, county, or other political subdivision for improvements, services, and facilities furnished by the city, county, or political subdivision for the benefit of the rental housing. However, these payments may not exceed the amount last levied as the annual tax of the city, county, or political subdivision upon the property prior to exemption.(7) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise:(a) "Group home" means a single-family dwelling financed, in whole or in part, by one or more of the sources listed in subsection (1)(b) of this section. The residents of a group home do not jointly constitute a household, but each resident must be considered to be a separate household occupying a separate dwelling unit. The individual incomes of the residents may not be aggregated for purposes of the exemption in this section;(b) "Low-income" means household income as defined by the department, provided that the definition may not exceed 80 percent of median household income, adjusted for household size, for the county in which the dwelling is located;(c) "Moderate-income household" means a single person, family, or unrelated persons living together whose adjusted income is more than 80 percent but at or below 115 percent of the median household income adjusted for household size, for the county where the household is located, as reported by the United States department of housing and urban development and in effect as of January 1st of the year the application for exemption is submitted;(d) "Occupied dwelling unit" means a living unit that is occupied by an individual or household as of December 31st of the first assessment year the rental housing becomes operational or is occupied by an individual or household on January 1st of each subsequent assessment year in which the claim for exemption is submitted. If the housing facility is comprised of three or fewer dwelling units and there are any unoccupied units on January 1st, the department shall base the amount of the exemption upon the number of occupied dwelling units as of December 31st of the first assessment year the rental housing becomes operational and on May 1st of each subsequent assessment year in which the claim for exemption is submitted;(e) "Rental housing" means a residential housing facility or group home that is occupied but not owned by qualifying households;(f) "Qualifying household" means a single person, family, or unrelated persons living together whose income is at or below 80 percent of the median income, at the time of move-in, adjusted for family size as most recently determined by the federal department of housing and urban development for the county in which the rental housing or mobile home park is located and in effect as of January 1st of the year the application for exemption is submitted; and(g) "Social housing" means mixed-income housing that is made available by a social housing agency for a period of at least 99 years to primarily serve low-income or moderate-income households.(h) "Social housing agency" means any public corporation created under RCW 35.21.730(5) for the purpose of developing, maintaining, and operating social housing.Sec. 4. RCW 84.36.805 and 2023 c 69 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) In order to qualify for an exemption under this chapter, the nonprofit organizations, associations, social housing agencies, or corporations must satisfy the conditions in this section.(2) The property must be used exclusively for the actual operation of the activity for which exemption is granted, unless otherwise provided, and does not exceed an amount reasonably necessary for that purpose. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section:(a) The loan or rental of the property does not subject the property to tax if:(i) The rents and donations received for the use of the portion of the property are reasonable and do not exceed the maintenance and operation expenses attributable to the portion of the property loaned or rented;(ii) Except for the exemptions under RCW 84.36.030(4), 84.36.037, 84.36.050, and 84.36.060(1) (a) and (b), the property would be exempt from tax if owned by the organization to which it is loaned or rented; and(iii) This subsection (2)(a) does not apply to exemptions granted under RCW 84.36.042;(b) The use of the property for fund-raising events does not subject the property to tax if the fund-raising events are consistent with the purposes for which the exemption is granted or are conducted by a nonprofit organization. If the property is loaned or rented to conduct a fund-raising event, the requirements of (a) of this subsection (2) apply;(c) An inadvertent use of the property in a manner inconsistent with the purpose for which exemption is granted does not subject the property to tax, if the inadvertent use is not part of a pattern of use. A pattern of use is presumed when an inadvertent use is repeated in the same assessment year or in two or more successive assessment years.(3) The facilities and services must be available to all regardless of race, color, national origin or ancestry.(4) The organization, association, or corporation must be duly licensed or certified where such licensing or certification is required by law or regulation.(5) Property sold to organizations, associations, social housing agencies, or corporations with an option to be repurchased by the seller does not qualify for exempt status. This subsection does not apply to:(a) Limited equity cooperatives as defined in RCW 84.36.675; or(b) Property sold to a nonprofit entity, as defined in RCW 84.36.560, or a social housing agency as defined in section 3 of this act, by:(i) A nonprofit as defined in RCW 84.36.800 that is exempt from income tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c) of the federal internal revenue code;(ii) A governmental entity established under RCW 35.21.660, 35.21.670, or 35.21.730;(iii) A housing authority created under RCW 35.82.030;(iv) A housing authority meeting the definition in RCW 35.82.210(2)(a); or(v) A housing authority established under RCW 35.82.300.(6) The department must have access to its books in order to determine whether the nonprofit organization, association, or corporation is exempt from taxes under this chapter.(7) This section does not apply to exemptions granted under RCW 84.36.020, 84.36.032, 84.36.250, 84.36.049, and 84.36.480(2).(8)(a) The use of property exempt under this chapter, other than as specifically authorized by this chapter, nullifies the exemption otherwise available for the property for the assessment year. However, the exemption is not nullified by the use of the property by any individual, group, or entity, where such use is not otherwise authorized by this chapter, for not more than 50 days in each calendar year, and the property is not used for pecuniary gain or to promote business activities for more than 15 of the 50 days in each calendar year. The 50 and 15-day limitations provided in this subsection (8)(a) do not include days during which setup and takedown activities take place immediately preceding or following a meeting or other event by an individual, group, or entity using the property as provided in this subsection (8)(a).(b) If uses of the exempt property exceed the 50 and 15-day limitations provided in (a) of this subsection (8) during an assessment year, the exemption is removed for the affected portion of the property for that assessment year.(c) The 15-day and 50-day limitations provided in (a) of this subsection (8) do not apply to property exempt under RCW 84.36.037 if the property is used for activities related to a qualifying farmers market, as defined in RCW 66.24.170, and all income received from rental or use of the exempt property is used for capital improvements to the exempt property, maintenance and operation of the exempt property, or exempt purposes. Exempt property under RCW 84.36.037 may be used for up to 53 days for the purposes of a qualifying farmers market.Sec. 5. RCW 84.36.805 and 2023 c 69 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) In order to qualify for an exemption under this chapter, the nonprofit organizations, associations, social housing agencies, or corporations must satisfy the conditions in this section.(2) The property must be used exclusively for the actual operation of the activity for which exemption is granted, unless otherwise provided, and does not exceed an amount reasonably necessary for that purpose. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section:(a) The loan or rental of the property does not subject the property to tax if:(i) The rents and donations received for the use of the portion of the property are reasonable and do not exceed the maintenance and operation expenses attributable to the portion of the property loaned or rented;(ii) Except for the exemptions under RCW 84.36.030(4), 84.36.037, 84.36.050, and 84.36.060(1) (a) and (b), the property would be exempt from tax if owned by the organization to which it is loaned or rented; and(iii) This subsection (2)(a) does not apply to exemptions granted under RCW 84.36.042;(b) The use of the property for fund-raising events does not subject the property to tax if the fund-raising events are consistent with the purposes for which the exemption is granted or are conducted by a nonprofit organization. If the property is loaned or rented to conduct a fund-raising event, the requirements of (a) of this subsection (2) apply;(c) An inadvertent use of the property in a manner inconsistent with the purpose for which exemption is granted does not subject the property to tax, if the inadvertent use is not part of a pattern of use. A pattern of use is presumed when an inadvertent use is repeated in the same assessment year or in two or more successive assessment years.(3) The facilities and services must be available to all regardless of race, color, national origin or ancestry.(4) The organization, association, or corporation must be duly licensed or certified where such licensing or certification is required by law or regulation.(5) Property sold to organizations, associations, social housing agencies, or corporations with an option to be repurchased by the seller does not qualify for exempt status. This subsection does not apply to property sold to a nonprofit entity, as defined in RCW 84.36.560(7), or a social housing agency as defined in section 3 of this act, by:(a) A nonprofit as defined in RCW 84.36.800 that is exempt from income tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c) of the federal internal revenue code;(b) A governmental entity established under RCW 35.21.660, 35.21.670, or 35.21.730;(c) A housing authority created under RCW 35.82.030;(d) A housing authority meeting the definition in RCW 35.82.210(2)(a); or(e) A housing authority established under RCW 35.82.300.(6) The department must have access to its books in order to determine whether the nonprofit organization, association, or corporation is exempt from taxes under this chapter.(7) This section does not apply to exemptions granted under RCW 84.36.020, 84.36.032, 84.36.250, 84.36.049, and 84.36.480(2).(8)(a) The use of property exempt under this chapter, other than as specifically authorized by this chapter, nullifies the exemption otherwise available for the property for the assessment year. However, the exemption is not nullified by the use of the property by any individual, group, or entity, where such use is not otherwise authorized by this chapter, for not more than fifty days in each calendar year, and the property is not used for pecuniary gain or to promote business activities for more than fifteen of the fifty days in each calendar year. The fifty and fifteen-day limitations provided in this subsection (8)(a) do not include days during which setup and takedown activities take place immediately preceding or following a meeting or other event by an individual, group, or entity using the property as provided in this subsection (8)(a).(b) If uses of the exempt property exceed the fifty and fifteen-day limitations provided in (a) of this subsection (8) during an assessment year, the exemption is removed for the affected portion of the property for that assessment year.(c) The 15-day and 50-day limitations provided in (a) of this subsection (8) do not apply to property exempt under RCW 84.36.037 if the property is used for activities related to a qualifying farmers market, as defined in RCW 66.24.170, and all income received from rental or use of the exempt property is used for capital improvements to the exempt property, maintenance and operation of the exempt property, or exempt purposes. Exempt property under RCW 84.36.037 may be used for up to 53 days for the purposes of a qualifying farmers market.Sec. 6. RCW 84.36.815 and 2022 c 93 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:(1) In order to qualify for exempt status for any real or personal property under this chapter except personal property under RCW 84.36.600, all foreign national governments; cemeteries; nongovernmental nonprofit corporations, organizations, and associations; hospitals owned and operated by a public hospital district for purposes of exemption under RCW 84.36.040(2); and soil and water conservation districts must file an initial application on or before March 31st with the state department of revenue. However, the initial application deadline for the exemption provided in RCW 84.36.049 is July 1st for 2016 and March 31st for 2017 and thereafter. All applications must be filed on forms prescribed by the department and must be signed by an authorized agent of the applicant.(2)(a) In order to requalify for exempt status, all applicants except nonprofit cemeteries and nonprofits receiving the exemption under RCW 84.36.049 and nonprofits receiving the exemptions under RCW 84.36.560 or 84.36.675 must file an annual renewal declaration on or before March 31st each year. The renewal declaration must be on forms prescribed by the department of revenue and must contain a statement certifying the exempt status of the real or personal property owned by the exempt organization. This renewal declaration may be submitted electronically in a format provided or approved by the department. Information may also be required with the renewal declaration to assist the department in determining whether the property tax exemption should continue.(b) In order to requalify for exempt status, nonprofits receiving the exemptions under RCW 84.36.560 or 84.36.675, or social housing agencies receiving the exemption under section 3 of this act, must file a renewal declaration on or before March 31st of every third year following initial qualification for the exemption. Except for the annual renewal requirement, all other requirements of (a) of this subsection apply.(3) When an organization acquires real property qualified for exemption or converts real property to exempt status, the organization must file an initial application for the property within sixty days following the acquisition or conversion in accordance with all applicable provisions of subsection (1) of this section. If the application is filed after the expiration of the 60-day period, a late filing penalty is imposed under RCW 84.36.825.(4) When organizations acquire real property qualified for exemption or convert real property to an exempt use, the property, upon approval of the application for exemption, is entitled to a property tax exemption for property taxes due and payable the following year. If the owner has paid taxes for the year following the year the property qualified for exemption, the owner is entitled to a refund of the amount paid on the property so acquired or converted.(5) The department must share approved initial applications for the tax preferences provided in RCW 84.36.049 and 84.36.675 with the joint legislative audit and review committee, upon request by the committee, in order for the committee to complete its review of the tax preferences provided in RCW 84.36.049 and 84.36.675.Sec. 7. RCW 84.36.815 and 2020 c 273 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) In order to qualify for exempt status for any real or personal property under this chapter except personal property under RCW 84.36.600, all foreign national governments; cemeteries; nongovernmental nonprofit corporations, organizations, and associations; hospitals owned and operated by a public hospital district for purposes of exemption under RCW 84.36.040(2); and soil and water conservation districts must file an initial application on or before March 31st with the state department of revenue. However, the initial application deadline for the exemption provided in RCW 84.36.049 is July 1st for 2016 and March 31st for 2017 and thereafter. All applications must be filed on forms prescribed by the department and must be signed by an authorized agent of the applicant.(2)(a) In order to requalify for exempt status, all applicants except nonprofit cemeteries and nonprofits receiving the exemption under RCW 84.36.049 and nonprofits receiving the exemption under RCW 84.36.560 must file an annual renewal declaration on or before March 31st each year. The renewal declaration must be on forms prescribed by the department of revenue and must contain a statement certifying the exempt status of the real or personal property owned by the exempt organization. This renewal declaration may be submitted electronically in a format provided or approved by the department. Information may also be required with the renewal declaration to assist the department in determining whether the property tax exemption should continue.(b) In order to requalify for exempt status, nonprofits receiving the exemption under RCW 84.36.560, or social housing agencies receiving the exemption under section 3 of this act, must file a renewal declaration on or before March 31st of every third year following initial qualification for the exemption. Except for the annual renewal requirement, all other requirements of (a) of this subsection apply.(3) When an organization acquires real property qualified for exemption or converts real property to exempt status, the organization must file an initial application for the property within sixty days following the acquisition or conversion in accordance with all applicable provisions of subsection (1) of this section. If the application is filed after the expiration of the sixty-day period, a late filing penalty is imposed under RCW 84.36.825.(4) When organizations acquire real property qualified for exemption or convert real property to an exempt use, the property, upon approval of the application for exemption, is entitled to a property tax exemption for property taxes due and payable the following year. If the owner has paid taxes for the year following the year the property qualified for exemption, the owner is entitled to a refund of the amount paid on the property so acquired or converted.(5) The department must share approved initial applications for the tax preference provided in RCW 84.36.049 with the joint legislative audit and review committee, upon request by the committee, in order for the committee to complete its review of the tax preference provided in RCW 84.36.049.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8. Sections 3 through 5 of this act apply to taxes levied for collection in 2027 and thereafter.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 9. Section 1 of this act takes effect January 1, 2027.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 10. RCW 82.32.805 and 82.32.808 do not apply to this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 11. Section 1 of this act expires January 1, 2030.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 12. Section 2 of this act takes effect January 1, 2030.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 13. Section 4 of this act expires January 1, 2033.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 14. Section 5 of this act takes effect January 1, 2033.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 15. Section 6 of this act expires January 1, 2033.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 16. Section 7 of this act takes effect January 1, 2033.--- END ---